Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Chapter 2 Dissolution of Marriage

Cross references. —

As to creation of marital relationship, see §

20-1-101

et seq.

As to divorce not affecting inheritance by children, see §

2-4-106

.

For duty of clerk of court in case of divorce or annulment with reference to vital statistics, see §

35-1-423

.

For rule of civil procedure providing that Rule 65, relative to injunctions, shall not apply to suits for divorce, alimony, separate maintenance or custody of infants, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

For form of complaint for divorce under the Rules of Civil Procedure, see Form 15, Appendix of Forms, W.R.C.P.

History of chapter. —

The provisions of this chapter appeared in W.C.S. 1945 (code of civil procedure), chapter 3, as article 59. This chapter, however, was not enacted as part of the civil code.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Mediation and Wyoming Domestic Relations Cases — Practical Considerations, Ethical Concerns and Proposed Standards of Practice,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d Annulment of Marriage § 1 et seq.; 24 Am. Jur. 2d Divorce and Separation § 1 et seq.

Appointment of counsel for indigent husband or wife in action for divorce or separation, 85 ALR3d 983.

What constitutes contract between husband or wife and third person promotive of divorce or separation, 93 ALR3d 523.

Layman's assistance to party in divorce proceeding as unauthorized practice of law, 12 ALR4th 656.

Vacating or setting aside divorce decree after remarriage of party, 17 ALR4th 1153.

Spouse's liability, after divorce, for community debt contracted by other spouse during marriage, 20 ALR4th 211.

Effect of death of party to divorce proceeding pending appeal or time allowed for appeal, 33 ALR4th 47.

Modern status of views as to validity of premarital agreements contemplating divorce or separation, 53 ALR4th 22.

Enforceability of premarital agreements governing support or property rights upon divorce or separation as affected by circumstances surrounding execution — modern status, 53 ALR4th 85.

Enforceability of premarital agreements governing support or property rights upon divorce or separation as affected by fairness or adequacy of those terms — modern status, 53 ALR4th 161.

Right to jury trial in state court divorce proceedings, 56 ALR4th 955.

Lis pendens as applicable to suit for separation or dissolution of marriage, 65 ALR4th 522.

Joinder of tort actions between spouses with proceeding for dissolution of marriage, 4 ALR5th 972.

Enforcement of claim for alimony or support, or for attorneys' fees and costs incurred in connection therewith, against exemptions, 52 ALR5th 221.

27A C.J.S. Divorce § 1 et seq.; 55 C.J.S. Marriage § 1 et seq.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice § 37.04 (Matthew Bender).